California, session 20252026, AB2550.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9603 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:9603. (a) The department shall collect all of the following data:(1) The current supply of women in construction, construction workers who are women, by specialty.(2) The geographical distribution of women as construction						workers, workers who are women, by specialty.(3) The diversity of women in construction, construction workers who are women, by specialty, including, but not limited to, data on race, ethnicity, and languages spoken.(4) The current and forecasted demand for women in construction, construction workers, by specialty.(5) The training and educational capacity to produce trained, certified, and licensed						women in construction, construction workers, by specialty and geographical distribution, including, but not limited to, the number of educational slots, state-registered preapprenticeship and apprenticeship slots, the number of enrollments, the attrition rate, and wait time to enter a program of study. program. The department shall work with the Department of Industrial Relations’ Division of Apprenticeship Standards to determine this capacity within state-registered construction preapprenticeship and apprenticeship programs as well as to determine the number of construction preapprentices and apprentices in any given year who are women.(b) On or before July 1, 2027, and every three years thereafter, the department shall transmit a report of the data collected pursuant to this section to the Legislature. The department shall transmit the report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) The department shall post a report transmitted pursuant to subdivision (b) on its internet website.